District of Columbia statutes.
7-702.07

Immunity from liability.

(a)

No employee, designee, or representative of the program shall be held liable for the good faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter, except that no immunity shall extend to criminal acts.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

No communication made by the ombudsman or his or her designee, if reasonably related to the requirements of his or her responsibilities, shall be subject to civil action.

(d)

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 207, 36 DCR 534
Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-321, § 2(d), 57 DCR 12438

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3517.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-321 repealed subsecs. (b) and (d); and, in subsec. (c), substituted “action” for “action for libel or slander”.